Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-239.03
Authority; public safety communication projects; powers.

In addition to the powers granted under section 58-239, the authority may:

(1) Borrow money and issue bonds for the purpose of financing public safety communication projects; and

(2) Enter into financing agreements for a public safety communication project with a joint entity created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or a joint public agency created pursuant to the Joint Public Agency Act.

Laws 2002, LB 1211, § 7.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.